Illinois, session 104th, HB1241.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 5changing Section 5-4.5-105 as follows: 6    (730 ILCS 5/5-4.5-105)7    Sec. 5-4.5-105. SENTENCING OF INDIVIDUALS UNDER THE AGE OF 821 18 AT THE TIME OF THE COMMISSION OF AN OFFENSE.9    (a) On or after January 1, 2016 (the effective date of 10Public Act 99-69), when a person commits an offense and the 11person is under 21 18 years of age at the time of the 12commission of the offense, the court, at the sentencing 13hearing conducted under Section 5-4-1, shall consider the 14following additional factors in mitigation in determining the 15appropriate sentence:16        (1) the person's age, impetuosity, and level of 17    maturity at the time of the offense, including the ability 18    to consider risks and consequences of behavior, and the 19    presence of cognitive or developmental disability, or 20    both, if any;21        (2) whether the person was subjected to outside 22    pressure, including peer pressure, familial pressure, or 23    negative influences;  HB1241- 2 -LRB104 06055 RLC 16088 b1        (3) the person's family, home environment, educational 2    and social background, including any history of parental 3    neglect, domestic or sexual violence, sexual exploitation, 4    physical abuse, or other childhood trauma including 5    adverse childhood experiences (or ACEs);6        (4) the person's potential for rehabilitation or 7    evidence of rehabilitation, or both;8        (5) the circumstances of the offense;9        (6) the person's degree of participation and specific 10    role in the offense, including the level of planning by 11    the defendant before the offense;12        (7) whether the person was able to meaningfully 13    participate in his or her defense;14        (8) the person's prior juvenile or criminal history;15        (9) the person's involvement in the child welfare 16    system;17        (10) involvement of the person in the community;18        (11) if a comprehensive mental health evaluation of 19    the person was conducted by a qualified mental health 20    professional, the outcome of the evaluation; and 21        (12) any other information the court finds relevant 22    and reliable, including an expression of remorse, if 23    appropriate. However, if the person, on advice of counsel 24    chooses not to make a statement, the court shall not 25    consider a lack of an expression of remorse as an 26    aggravating factor.  HB1241- 3 -LRB104 06055 RLC 16088 b1    (b) The trial judge shall specify on the record its 2consideration of the factors under subsection (a) of this 3Section.4    (b-5) Except as provided in subsection (c), the court may, 5in its discretion, sentence a defendant who was under 21 years 6of age at the time of the commission of the offense to a 7sentence that is less than the applicable minimum determinate 8sentence of imprisonment for the offense authorized by this 9Code. 10    (c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if the 11court determines by clear and convincing evidence that the 12individual against whom the person is convicted of committing 13the offense previously committed a crime under Section 10-9, 14Section 11-1.20, Section 11-1.30, Section 11-1.40, Section 1511-1.50, Section 11-1.60, Section 11-6, Section 11-6.5, 16Section 11-6.6, Section 11-9.1, Section 11-14.3, Section 1711-14.4 or Section 11-18.1 of the Criminal Code of 2012 18against the person within 3 years before the offense in which 19the person was convicted, the court may, in its discretion:20        (1) transfer the person to juvenile court for 21    sentencing under Section 5-710 of the Juvenile Court Act 22    of 1987;23        (2) depart from any mandatory minimum sentence, 24    maximum sentence, or sentencing enhancement; or25        (3) suspend any portion of an otherwise applicable 26    sentence.  HB1241- 4 -LRB104 06055 RLC 16088 b1    (d) Subsection (c) shall be construed as prioritizing the 2successful treatment and rehabilitation of persons under 18 3years of age who are sex crime victims who commit acts of 4violence against their abusers. It is the General Assembly's 5intent that these persons be viewed as victims and provided 6treatment and services in the community and in the juvenile or 7family court system. 8    (e) Except as provided in subsections (f) and (g), the 9court may sentence the defendant to any disposition authorized 10for the class of the offense of which he or she was found 11guilty as described in Article 4.5 of this Code, and may, in 12its discretion, decline to impose any otherwise applicable 13sentencing enhancement based upon firearm possession, 14possession with personal discharge, or possession with 15personal discharge that proximately causes great bodily harm, 16permanent disability, permanent disfigurement, or death to 17another person.18    (f) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if the 19defendant is convicted of first degree murder and would 20otherwise be subject to sentencing under clause (iii), (iv), 21(v), or (vii) of subparagraph (c) of paragraph (1) of 22subsection (a) of Section 5-8-1 of this Code based on the 23category of persons identified therein, the court shall impose 24a sentence of not less than 40 years of imprisonment, except 25for persons convicted of first degree murder where subsection 26(c) applies. In addition, the court may, in its discretion,   HB1241- 5 -LRB104 06055 RLC 16088 b1decline to impose the sentencing enhancements based upon the 2possession or use of a firearm during the commission of the 3offense included in subsection (d) of Section 5-8-1. 4    (g) Fines and assessments, such as fees or administrative 5costs, shall not be ordered or imposed against a minor subject 6to this Code or against the minor's parent, guardian, or legal 7custodian. For the purposes of this subsection (g), "minor" 8has the meaning provided in Section 1-3 of the Juvenile Court 9Act of 1987 and includes any minor under the age of 18 10transferred to adult court or excluded from juvenile court 11jurisdiction under Article V of the Juvenile Court Act of 121987. 13(Source: P.A. 103-191, eff. 1-1-24; 103-379, eff. 7-28-23; 14103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 15    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 16becoming law.